Illinois, session 104th, SB3867.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the State 5Employee Child Care Pilot Program Task Force Act. 6    Section 3. Policy and intent. 7    (a) It is the policy of this State to promote workforce 8stability, recruitment, and retention among State employees by 9improving access to affordable, high-quality child care.10    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to convene 11State agencies, institutions of higher education, labor 12organizations, and early childhood education stakeholders to 13evaluate the feasibility of an on-site child care pilot 14program for State employees while strengthening the early 15childhood education and child care workforce. 16    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 17following:18        (1) Access to reliable and affordable child care is 19    essential to workforce participation and economic 20    stability for working families.21        (2) Illinois continues to experience a shortage of 22    licensed early childhood educators and child care   SB3867- 2 -LRB104 19541 KTG 32989 b1    professionals, limiting access to care across the State.2        (3) State employees are uniquely impacted by child 3    care shortages due to fixed work schedules and limited 4    availability of licensed care during working hours.5        (4) Paid internship, and apprenticeship programs have 6    proven effective in developing sustainable workforce 7    pipelines in early childhood education and other 8    professions.9        (5) Strategic investment in early childhood education 10    supports long-term educational achievement, workforce 11    readiness, and economic growth.12        (6) An on-site child care pilot program for State 13    employees may strengthen employee retention while 14    expanding training opportunities for future early 15    childhood educators. 16    Section 10. Members. The State Employee Child Care Pilot 17Program Task Force is established within the Department of 18Early Childhood. The Task Force shall consist of the following 19members: 20        (1) The Secretary of Early Childhood or the 21    Secretary's designee.22        (2) The Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary's 23    designee.24        (3) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 25    President of the Senate.  SB3867- 3 -LRB104 19541 KTG 32989 b1        (4) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 2    Minority Leader of the Senate.3        (5) One member of the House of Representatives, 4    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.5        (6) One member of the House of Representatives, 6    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 7    Representatives.8        (7) One representative of the University of Illinois 9    Springfield with expertise in early childhood education, 10    appointed by the Governor.11        (8) One representative of a statewide child care 12    provider organization, appointed by the Governor.13        (9) One representative of a statewide organization 14    representing State employee labor interests, appointed by 15    the Governor.16        (10) One representative with expertise in child care 17    licensing, regulation, or quality standards, appointed by 18    the Governor.19    All members of the Task Force shall serve without 20compensation. Members shall be appointed within 120 days after 21the effective date of this Act. At the initial meeting, the 22Task Force shall elect 2 co-chairs. 23    Section 15. Meetings. The Task Force shall hold its 24initial meeting within 160 days after the effective date of 25this Act. The Task Force shall hold at least 4 meetings.   SB3867- 4 -LRB104 19541 KTG 32989 b1    Section 20. Duties. The Task Force shall have the 2following duties:3        (1) Evaluate the feasibility of establishing an 4    on-site child care pilot program for State employees.5        (2) Develop recommendations regarding pilot program 6    structure, staffing models, and operational oversight.7        (3) Evaluate the feasibility of a paid internship, or 8    apprenticeship program in partnership with the University 9    of Illinois Springfield and other public universities, 10    including alignment with existing State internship 11    programs.12        (4) Develop recommendations regarding staffing ratios, 13    training requirements, and supervision of student 14    participants.15        (5) Identify potential State-owned or leased 16    facilities suitable for pilot program locations.17        (6) Assess projected start-up and ongoing operational 18    costs and identify potential funding sources.19    The Task Force shall solicit feedback from early childhood 20education professionals, child care providers, institutions of 21higher education, State employees, labor organizations, and 22other relevant stakeholders. 23    Section 25. Reporting. No later than one year after the 24first meeting of the Task Force, the Task Force shall submit a   SB3867- 5 -LRB104 19541 KTG 32989 b1report to the General Assembly and the Governor that includes 2findings, recommendations, estimated costs, and any proposed 3statutory or administrative changes necessary to implement a 4pilot program. 5    Section 30. Dissolution; repeal. The Task Force is 6dissolved and this Act is repealed on December 31, 2027. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.